Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1610
Prohibited acts; enumerated.

No entity of whatever kind, alone or in concert with others, shall:

(1) Operate in this state a private postsecondary career school not exempted from the Private Postsecondary Career School Act unless the school has a currently valid authorization to operate issued pursuant to section 85-1612;

(2) Offer, as or through an agent, unless such agent is a natural person and has a currently valid agent's permit issued pursuant to section 85-1623, enrollment or instruction in or the granting of educational credentials from a private postsecondary career school not exempted from the act, whether such institution is within or outside this state, nor accept contracts or enrollment applications from any person who does not have a current agent's permit, but the board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to permit the rendering of legitimate public information services without such permit;

(3) Instruct or educate, offer to instruct or educate, including advertising or soliciting for such purpose, enroll or offer to enroll, or contract or offer to contract with any school or party to perform any such act in this state, whether such entity is located within or without this state, unless such entity observes and is in compliance with the minimum standards established pursuant to sections 85-1606 and 85-1608 and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department;

(4) Grant or offer to grant educational credentials without authorization to do so from the department; or

(5) Have a cohort default rate which triggers state liability pursuant to section 428(n) of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended, under section 85-9,139.02.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 11;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2811;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 29, § 3.